Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2329.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 38-2361 is hereby amended to read as follows: 38-
2361. (a) Upon adjudication as a juvenile offender pursuant to K.S.A. 38-
2356, and amendments thereto, modification of sentence pursuant to
K.S.A. 38-2367, and amendments thereto, or violation of a condition of
sentence pursuant to K.S.A. 38-2368, and amendments thereto, the court
may impose one or more of the following sentencing alternatives for a
fixed period pursuant to K.S.A. 38-2369 and 38-2391, and amendments
thereto.
(1) Place the juvenile on probation for a fixed period pursuant to
K.S.A. 38-2391, and amendments thereto, subject to terms and conditions
the court deems appropriate consistent with juvenile justice programs in
the community. Any juvenile placed on probation shall be supervised
according to the juvenile's risk and needs as determined by a risk and
needs assessment. Placement of juvenile offenders to community
corrections for probation supervision shall be limited to offenders
adjudicated for an offense that are determined to be moderate-risk, high-

HB 2329—Am. by HCW 2
risk or very high-risk on a risk and needs assessment using the cutoff
scores established by the secretary pursuant to K.S.A. 38-2360, and
amendments thereto.
(2) Order the juvenile to participate in a community based program
available in such judicial district subject to the terms and conditions the
court deems appropriate. This alternative shall not be ordered with the
alternative in paragraph (11). Requirements pertaining to child support
may apply if custody is vested with other than a parent.
(3) Place the juvenile in the custody of a parent or other suitable
person, which is not a group home youth residential facility or other
facility licensed pursuant to article 5 of chapter 65 of the Kansas Statutes
Annotated, and amendments thereto, subject to terms and conditions
consistent with juvenile justice programs in the community. This
alternative shall not be ordered with the alternative in paragraph (10) or
(11). Requirements pertaining to child support may apply if custody is
vested with other than a parent.
(4) Order the juvenile to attend counseling, educational, mediation or
other sessions, or to undergo a drug evaluation pursuant to subsection (b).
(5) Suspend or restrict the juvenile's driver's license or privilege to
operate a motor vehicle on the streets and highways of this state pursuant
to subsection (c).
(6) Order the juvenile to perform charitable or community service
work.
(7) Order the juvenile to make appropriate reparation or restitution
pursuant to subsection (d).
(8) Order the juvenile to pay a fine not exceeding $1,000 pursuant to
subsection (e).
(9) Place the juvenile under a house arrest program administered by
the court pursuant to K.S.A. 21-6609, and amendments thereto.
(10) Place the juvenile in the custody of the secretary of corrections
as provided in K.S.A. 38-2365, and amendments thereto, and order the
secretary to place the juvenile in a youth residential facility. This
alternative shall not be ordered with the alternative in paragraph (3) or
(12). Except for mandatory drug and alcohol evaluation, when this
alternative is ordered with alternatives in paragraphs (2), (4) and (9), such
orders shall constitute a recommendation by the court. Requirements
pertaining to child support shall apply under this alternative. The
provisions of this paragraph shall expire on January 1, 2018.
(11) Upon a violation of a condition of sentence, other than a
technical violation pursuant to K.S.A. 38-2368, and amendments thereto,
commit the juvenile to detention for a period no longer than 30 days
subject to the provisions of subsection (g).
(12) If the judge finds and enters into the written record that the

HB 2329—Am. by HCW 3
juvenile poses a significant risk of harm to another or damage to property,
and the juvenile is otherwise eligible for commitment pursuant to K.S.A.
38-2369, and amendments thereto, commit the juvenile directly to the
custody of the secretary of corrections for placement in a juvenile
correctional facility or a youth residential facility. Placement in a youth
residential facility shall only be permitted as authorized in K.S.A. 38-
2369(e), and amendments thereto. If the court elects, a period of
conditional release pursuant to K.S.A. 38-2369, and amendments thereto,
may also be ordered. The period of conditional release shall be limited to a
maximum of six months and shall be subject to graduated responses.
Twenty-one days prior to the juvenile's release from a juvenile correctional
facility, the secretary of corrections or designee shall notify the court of the
juvenile's anticipated release date. This alternative may be ordered with the
alternative in paragraph (7). Requirements pertaining to child support shall
apply under this alternative.
(13) Upon a finding by the trier of fact during adjudication that a
firearm was possessed or used in during the commission of an offense by
the accused which, if committed by an adult, would constitute a felony, a
judge may commit the juvenile directly to the custody of the secretary of
corrections for placement in a juvenile correctional facility or youth
residential facility for a minimum term of six 12 months and up to a
maximum term of 18 24 months, regardless of the risk level of such
juvenile as determined by a risk and needs assessment. If the juvenile is
committed to the custody of the secretary, and the court elects, a period of
conditional release, pursuant to K.S.A. 38-2369, and amendments thereto,
may also be ordered. The period of conditional release shall be limited to a
maximum of six months and shall be subject to graduated responses.
Twenty-one days prior to the juvenile's release from a juvenile correctional
facility or youth residential facility, the secretary of corrections or the
secretary's designee shall notify the court of the juvenile's anticipated
release date.
(b) If the court orders the juvenile to attend counseling, educational,
mediation or other sessions, or to undergo a drug and alcohol evaluation
pursuant to subsection (a)(4), the following provisions apply:
(1) The court may order the juvenile offender to participate in
counseling or mediation sessions or a program of education, including
placement in an alternative educational program approved by a local
school board. The costs of any counseling or mediation may be assessed as
expenses in the case. No mental health center shall charge a fee for court-
ordered counseling greater than what the center would have charged the
person receiving the counseling if the person had requested counseling on
the person's own initiative. No mediator shall charge a fee for court-
ordered mediation greater than what the mediator would have charged the

HB 2329—Am. by HCW 4
person participating in the mediation if the person had requested mediation
on the person's own initiative. Mediation may include the victim but shall
not be mandatory for the victim; and
(2) if the juvenile has been adjudicated to be a juvenile by reason of a
violation of a statute that makes such a requirement, the court shall order
and, if adjudicated for any other offense, the court may order the juvenile
to submit to and complete a drug and alcohol evaluation by a community-
based drug and alcohol safety action program certified pursuant to K.S.A.
8-1008, and amendments thereto, and to pay a fee not to exceed the fee
established by that statute for such evaluation. The court may waive the
mandatory evaluation if the court finds that the juvenile completed a drug
and alcohol evaluation, approved by the community-based alcohol and
drug safety action program, within 12 months before sentencing. If the
evaluation occurred more than 12 months before sentencing, the court
shall order the juvenile to resubmit to and complete the evaluation and
program as provided herein. If the court finds that the juvenile and those
legally liable for the juvenile's support are indigent, the court may waive
the fee. In no event shall the fee be assessed against the secretary of
corrections or the department of corrections nor shall the fee be assessed
against the secretary of the department for children and families or the
Kansas department for children and families if the juvenile is in the
secretary's care, custody and control.
(c) If the court orders suspension or restriction of a juvenile offender's
driver's license or privilege to operate a motor vehicle on the streets and
highways of this state pursuant to subsection (a)(5), the following
provisions apply:
(1) The duration of the suspension ordered by the court shall be for a
definite time period to be determined by the court. Upon suspension of a
license pursuant to this subsection, the court shall require the juvenile
offender to surrender the license to the court. The court shall transmit the
license to the division of motor vehicles of the department of revenue, to
be retained until the period of suspension expires. At that time, the licensee
may apply to the division for return of the license. If the license has
expired, the juvenile offender may apply for a new license, which shall be
issued promptly upon payment of the proper fee and satisfaction of other
conditions established by law for obtaining a license unless another
suspension or revocation of the juvenile offender's privilege to operate a
motor vehicle is in effect. As used in this subsection, "highway" and
"street" have the meanings provided by mean the same as defined in
K.S.A. 8-1424 and 8-1473, and amendments thereto. Any juvenile
offender who does not have a driver's license may have driving privileges
revoked. No Kansas driver's license shall be issued to a juvenile offender
whose driving privileges have been revoked pursuant to this section for a

HB 2329—Am. by HCW 5
definite time period to be determined by the court; and
(2) in lieu of suspending a juvenile offender's driver's license or
privilege to operate a motor vehicle on the highways of this state, the court
may enter an order which places conditions on the juvenile offender's
privilege of operating a motor vehicle on the streets and highways of this
state, a certified copy of which the juvenile offender shall be required to
carry any time the juvenile offender is operating a motor vehicle on the
streets and highways of this state. The order shall prescribe a definite time
period for the conditions imposed. Upon entering an order restricting a
juvenile offender's license, the court shall require the juvenile offender to
surrender such juvenile offender's license to the court. The court shall
transmit the license to the division of vehicles, together with a copy of the
order. Upon receipt thereof, the division of vehicles shall issue without
charge a driver's license which shall indicate on its face that conditions
have been imposed on the juvenile offender's privilege of operating a
motor vehicle and that a certified copy of the order imposing the
conditions is required to be carried by the juvenile offender when
operating a motor vehicle on the streets and highways of this state. If the
juvenile offender is a nonresident, the court shall cause a copy of the order
to be transmitted to the division and the division shall forward a copy of it
to the motor vehicle administrator of the juvenile offender's state of
issuance. The court shall furnish to any juvenile offender whose driver's
license has had conditions imposed on it under this section a copy of the
order, which shall be recognized as a valid Kansas driver's license until the
division issues the restricted license provided for in this subsection. Upon
expiration of the period of time for which conditions are imposed pursuant
to this subsection, the juvenile offender may apply to the division for the
return of the license previously surrendered by the juvenile offender. In the
event the license has expired, the juvenile offender may apply to the
division for a new license, which shall be issued immediately by the
division upon payment of the proper fee and satisfaction of the other
conditions established by law unless such juvenile offender's privilege to
operate a motor vehicle on the streets and highways of this state has been
suspended or revoked prior thereto. If any juvenile offender violates any of
the conditions imposed under this subsection, the juvenile offender's
driver's license or privilege to operate a motor vehicle on the streets and
highways of this state shall be revoked for a period as determined by the
court in which the juvenile offender is convicted of violating such
conditions.
(d) The following provisions apply to the court's determination of
whether to order reparation or restitution pursuant to subsection (a)(7):
(1) The court shall order the juvenile to make reparation or restitution
to the aggrieved party for the damage or loss caused by the juvenile

HB 2329—Am. by HCW 6
offender's offense unless it finds compelling circumstances that would
render a plan of reparation or restitution unworkable. If the court finds
compelling circumstances that would render a plan of reparation or
restitution unworkable, the court shall enter such findings with
particularity on the record. In lieu of reparation or restitution, the court
may order the juvenile to perform charitable or social service for
organizations performing services for the community; and
(2) restitution may include, but shall not be limited to, the amount of
damage or loss caused by the juvenile's offense. Restitution may be made
by payment of an amount fixed by the court or by working for the parties
sustaining loss in the manner ordered by the court. An order of monetary
restitution shall be a judgment against the juvenile that may be collected
by the court by garnishment or other execution as on judgments in civil
cases. Such judgment shall not be affected by the termination of the court's
jurisdiction over the juvenile offender.
(e) If the court imposes a fine pursuant to subsection (a)(8), the
following provisions apply:
(1) The amount of the fine may not exceed $1,000 for each offense.
The amount of the fine should be related to the seriousness of the offense
and the juvenile's ability to pay. Payment of a fine may be required in a
lump sum or installments;
(2) in determining whether to impose a fine and the amount to be
imposed, the court shall consider that imposition of a fine is most
appropriate in cases where the juvenile has derived pecuniary gain from
the offense and that imposition of a restitution order is preferable to
imposition of a fine; and
(3) any fine imposed by the court shall be a judgment against the
juvenile that may be collected by the court by garnishment or other
execution as on judgments in civil cases. Such judgment shall not be
affected by the termination of the court's jurisdiction over the juvenile.
(f) Before the court sentences a juvenile offender pursuant to
subsection (a), the court shall administer a risk assessment tool, as
described in K.S.A. 38-2360, and amendments thereto, or review a risk
assessment tool that was administered within the past six months to the
juvenile and use the results of that assessment to inform orders made
pursuant to K.S.A. 38-2369 and 38-2391, and amendments thereto.
(g) If the court commits the juvenile to detention pursuant to
subsection (a)(11), the following provisions shall apply:
(1) The court shall only order commitment to detention upon
violation of sentencing conditions where all other alternatives have been
exhausted.
(2) In order to commit a juvenile to detention upon violation of
sentencing conditions, the court shall find that the juvenile poses a

HB 2329—Am. by HCW 7
significant risk of harm to another or damage to property, is charged with a
new felony offense, or violates conditional release.
(3) The court shall not order commitment to detention upon
adjudication as a juvenile offender pursuant to K.S.A. 38-2356, and
amendments thereto, for solely technical violations of probation, contempt,
a violation of a valid court order, to protect from self-harm or due to any
state or county failure to find adequate alternatives.
(4) Cumulative detention use shall be limited to a maximum of 45
{90} days over the course of a juvenile offender's case pursuant to K.S.A.
38-2391, and amendments thereto. The court shall review any detention
commitment every seven days and may shorten the initial commitment or
extend the commitment. In no case, however, may the term of detention or
any extension thereof exceed the cumulative detention limit of 45 {90}
days or the overall case length limit.
(5) A juvenile over 18 years of age and less than 23 years of age at
sentencing shall be committed to a county jail, in lieu of a juvenile
detention center, under the same time restrictions imposed by paragraph
(1), but shall not be committed to or confined in a juvenile detention
facility.
(h) Any order issued by the judge pursuant to this section shall be in
effect immediately upon entry into the court's minutes.
(i) In addition to the requirements of K.S.A. 38-2373, and
amendments thereto, if a person is under 18 years of age and convicted of
a felony or adjudicated as a juvenile offender for an offense if committed
by an adult would constitute the commission of a felony, the court shall
forward a signed copy of the journal entry to the secretary of corrections
within 30 days of final disposition.
(j) (1) Except as further provided, if a juvenile has been adjudged to
be a juvenile offender for an offense which, if committed by an adult
would constitute the commission of: (1) (A) Aggravated human
trafficking, as defined in K.S.A. 21-5426(b), and amendments thereto, if
the victim is less than 14 years of age; (2) (B) rape, as defined in K.S.A.
21-5503(a)(3), and amendments thereto; (3) (C) aggravated indecent
liberties with a child, as defined in K.S.A. 21-5506(b)(3), and amendments
thereto; (4) (D) aggravated criminal sodomy, as defined in K.S.A. 21-
5504(b)(1) or (b)(2), and amendments thereto; (5) (E) commercial sexual
exploitation of a child, as defined in K.S.A. 21-6422, and amendments
thereto, if the victim is less than 14 years of age; (6) (F) sexual
exploitation of a child, as defined in K.S.A. 21-5510(a)(1) or (a)(4), and
amendments thereto, if the victim is less than 14 years of age; or (7) (G)
an attempt, conspiracy or criminal solicitation, as defined in K.S.A. 21-
5301, 21-5302 or 21-5303, and amendments thereto, of an offense defined
in paragraphs (1) through (6); subparagraphs (A) through (F).

HB 2329—Am. by HCW 8
(2) The court shall issue an order prohibiting the juvenile from
attending the attendance center that the victim of the offense attends. If
only one attendance center exists, for which the victim and juvenile are
eligible to attend, in the school district where the victim and the juvenile
reside, the court shall hear testimony and take evidence from the victim,
the juvenile, their families and a representative of the school district as to
why the juvenile should or should not be allowed to remain at the
attendance center attended by the victim. After such hearing, the court may
issue an order prohibiting the juvenile from attending the attendance center
that the victim of the offense attends.
(k) The court may order a short-term alternative placement of a
juvenile pursuant to subsection (a)(3) in an emergency shelter, therapeutic
foster home or community integration program if:
(1) Such juvenile has been adjudicated to be a juvenile offender for
an offense which, if committed by an adult would constitute the
commission of:
(A) Aggravated human trafficking, as defined in K.S.A. 21-5426(b),
and amendments thereto, if the victim is less than 14 years of age;
(B) rape, as defined in K.S.A. 21-5503, and amendments thereto;
(C) commercial sexual exploitation of a child, as defined in K.S.A.
21-6422, and amendments thereto, if the victim is less than 14 years of
age;
(D) sexual exploitation of a child, as defined in K.S.A. 21-5510(a)(1)
or (a)(4), and amendments thereto, if the victim is less than 14 years of
age;
(E) aggravated indecent liberties with a child, as defined in K.S.A.
21-5506, and amendments thereto, if the victim is less than 14 years of
age; or
(F) an attempt, conspiracy or criminal solicitation, as defined in
K.S.A. 21-5301, 21-5302 or 21-5303, and amendments thereto, of an
offense defined in paragraphs (1) through (4) subparagraphs (A) through
(E); and
(2) (A) the victim resides in the same home as the juvenile offender;
(B) a community supervision officer in consultation with the
department for children and families determines that an adequate safety
plan, which shall include the physical and psychological well-being of the
victim, cannot be developed to keep the juvenile in the same home; and
(C) there are no relevant child in need of care issues that would
permit a case to be filed under the Kansas code for care of children.
The presumptive term of commitment shall not extend beyond the
overall case length limit but may be modified pursuant to K.S.A. 38-2367
and 38-2397, and amendments thereto. If a child is placed outside the
child's home at the dispositional hearing pursuant to this subsection and no

HB 2329—Am. by HCW 9
reintegration plan is made a part of the record of the hearing, a written
reintegration plan shall be prepared pursuant to K.S.A. 38-2397, and
amendments thereto, and submitted to the court within 15 days of the
initial order of the court.
(l) If the court orders a short-term alternative placement of a juvenile
pursuant to subsection (k), the secretary shall be responsible for the costs
associated with all aspects of such placement. The secretary shall contract
with emergency shelters and therapeutic foster homes in order to facilitate
the placement of juvenile offenders pursuant to subsection (k).
(m) The sentencing hearing shall be open to the public as provided in
K.S.A. 38-2353, and amendments thereto.
(m)(n) The overall case length limit shall be calculated by the court
and entered into the written record when one or more of the sentencing
options under this section are imposed. The period fixed by the court
pursuant to subsection (a) shall not extend beyond the overall case length
limit.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 38-2365 is hereby amended to read as follows: 38-
2365. (a) When a juvenile offender has been placed in the custody of the
secretary, the secretary shall have a reasonable time to make a placement.
If the juvenile offender has not been placed, any party who believes that
the amount of time elapsed without placement has exceeded a reasonable
time may file a motion for review with the court. In determining what is a
reasonable amount of time, matters considered by the court shall include,
but not be limited to, the nature of the underlying offense, efforts made for
placement of the juvenile offender and the availability of a suitable
placement. The secretary shall notify the court, the juvenile's attorney of
record and the juvenile's parent, in writing, of the initial placement and any
subsequent change of placement as soon as the placement has been
accomplished. The notice to the juvenile offender's parent shall be sent to
such parent's last known address or addresses. Except as provided in
K.S.A. 38-2361(a)(10), the court shall have no power to direct a specific
placement by the secretary, but may make recommendations to the
secretary. Except as provided in K.S.A. 38-2361(a)(10), the secretary may
place the juvenile offender in an institution operated by the secretary, a
youth residential facility or any other appropriate placement. If the court
has recommended an out-of-home placement, the secretary may not return
the juvenile offender to the home from which removed without first
notifying the court of the plan.
(b) If a juvenile is in the custody of the secretary, the secretary shall
prepare and present a permanency plan at sentencing or within 30 days
thereafter. If the juvenile is 14 years of age or older and the juvenile is
able, the secretary shall prepare the permanency plan in consultation with
the juvenile. If a permanency plan is already in place under a child in need

HB 2329—Am. by HCW 10
of care proceeding, the court may adopt the plan under the present
proceeding. The written permanency plan shall provide for reintegration of
the juvenile into such juvenile's family or, if reintegration is not a viable
alternative, for other permanent placement of the juvenile. Reintegration
may not be a viable alternative when: (1) The parent has been found by a
court to have committed murder in the first degree, K.S.A. 21-3401, prior
to its repeal, or K.S.A. 21-5402, and amendments thereto, murder in the
second degree, K.S.A. 21-3402, prior to its repeal, or K.S.A. 21-5403, and
amendments thereto, capital murder, K.S.A. 21-3439, prior to its repeal, or
K.S.A. 21-5401, and amendments thereto, voluntary manslaughter, K.S.A.
21-3403, prior to its repeal, or K.S.A. 21-5404, and amendments thereto,
of a child or violated a law of another state which prohibits such murder or
manslaughter of a child;
(2) the parent aided or abetted, attempted, conspired or solicited to
commit such murder or voluntary manslaughter of a child;
(3) the parent committed a felony battery that resulted in bodily
injury to the juvenile who is the subject of this proceeding or another
child;
(4) the parent has subjected the juvenile who is the subject of this
proceeding or another child to aggravated circumstances as defined in
K.S.A. 38-1502, and amendments thereto;
(5) the parental rights of the parent to another child have been
terminated involuntarily; or
(6) the juvenile has been in extended out-of-home placement as
defined in K.S.A. 38-2202, and amendments thereto.
(c) If the juvenile is placed in the custody of the secretary, the plan
shall be prepared and submitted by the secretary. If the juvenile is placed
in the custody of a facility or person other than the secretary, the plan shall
be prepared and submitted by a court services officer. If the permanency
goal is reintegration into the family, the permanency plan shall include
measurable objectives and time schedules for reintegration.
(d) During the time a juvenile remains in the custody of the secretary,
the secretary shall submit to the court, at least every six months, a written
report of the progress being made toward the goals of the permanency plan
submitted pursuant to subsections (b) and (c) and the specific actions taken
to achieve the goals of the permanency plan. If the juvenile is placed in
foster care, the court may request the foster parent to submit to the court,
at least every six months, a report in regard to the juvenile's adjustment,
progress and condition. Such report shall be made a part of the juvenile's
court social file. The court shall review the plan submitted by the secretary
and the report, if any, submitted by the foster parent and determine
whether reasonable efforts and progress have been made to achieve the
goals of the permanency plan. If the court determines that progress is

HB 2329—Am. by HCW 11
inadequate or that the permanency plan is no longer viable, the court shall
hold a hearing pursuant to subsection (e).
(e) When the secretary has custody of the juvenile, a permanency
hearing shall be held no more than 12 months after the juvenile is first
placed outside such juvenile's home and at least every 12 months
thereafter. Juvenile offenders who have been in extended out-of-home
placement shall be provided a permanency hearing within 30 days of a
request from the secretary. The court may appoint a guardian ad litem to
represent the juvenile offender at the permanency hearing. At the
permanency hearing, the court shall determine whether and, if applicable,
when the juvenile will be:
(1) Reintegrated with the juvenile's parents;
(2) placed for adoption;
(3) placed with a permanent custodian; or
(4) if the juvenile is 16 years of age or older and the secretary has
documented compelling reasons why it would not be in the juvenile's best
interests for a placement in one of the placements pursuant to paragraphs
(1), (2) or (3), placed in another planned permanent arrangement.
(f) At each permanency hearing, the court shall:
(1) Make a written finding as to whether reasonable efforts have been
made to accomplish the permanency goal and whether continued out-of-
home placement is necessary for the juvenile's safety;
(2) make a written finding as to whether the reasonable and prudent
parenting standard has been met and whether the juvenile has regular,
ongoing opportunities to engage in age or developmentally appropriate
activities. The secretary shall report to the court the steps the secretary is
taking to ensure that the reasonable and prudent parenting standard is
being met and that the juvenile has regular, ongoing opportunities to
engage in age or developmentally appropriate activities, including
consultation with the juvenile in an age-appropriate manner about the
opportunities of the juvenile to participate in the activities; and
(3) if the juvenile is 14 years of age or older, document the efforts
made by the secretary to help the juvenile prepare for the transition from
custody to a successful adulthood. The secretary shall report to the court
the programs and services that are being provided to the juvenile which
will help the juvenile prepare for the transition from custody to a
successful adulthood.
(g) The requirements of this subsection shall apply only if the
permanency goal in place at the time of the hearing is another planned
permanent arrangement as described in subsection (e)(4). At each
permanency hearing held with respect to the juvenile, in addition to the
requirements of subsection (f), the court shall:
(1) Ask the juvenile, if the juvenile is able, by attendance at the

HB 2329—Am. by HCW 12
hearing or by report to the court, about the desired permanency outcome
for the juvenile;
(2) document the intensive, ongoing and, as of the date of the hearing,
unsuccessful permanency efforts made by the secretary to return the
juvenile home or secure a placement for the juvenile with a fit and willing
relative, a legal guardian or an adoptive parent. The secretary shall report
to the court the intensive, ongoing and, as of the date of the hearing,
unsuccessful efforts made by the secretary to return the juvenile home or
secure a placement for the juvenile with a fit and willing relative, a legal
guardian or an adoptive parent, including efforts that utilize search
technology, including social media, to find biological family members of
the children; and
(3) make a judicial determination explaining why, as of the date of
the hearing, another planned permanent living arrangement is the best
permanency plan for the juvenile and provide compelling reasons why it
continues to not be in the best interests of the juvenile to return home, be
placed for adoption, be placed with a legal guardian or be placed with a fit
and willing relative.
(h) Whenever a hearing is required under subsection (e), the court
shall notify all interested parties of the hearing date, the secretary, foster
parent and preadoptive parent or relatives providing care for the juvenile
and hold a hearing. If the juvenile is 14 years of age or older, the court
shall require notice of the time and place of the permanency hearing be
given to the juvenile. Such notice shall request the juvenile's participation
in the hearing by attendance or by report to the court. Individuals receiving
notice pursuant to this subsection shall not be made a party to the action
solely on the basis of this notice and opportunity to be heard. After
providing the persons receiving notice an opportunity to be heard, the
court shall determine whether the juvenile's needs are being adequately
met; whether services set out in the permanency plan necessary for the
safe return of the juvenile have been made available to the parent with
whom reintegration is planned; and whether reasonable efforts and
progress have been made to achieve the goals of the permanency plan.
(i) If the court finds reintegration continues to be a viable alternative,
the court shall determine whether and, if applicable, when the juvenile will
be returned to the parent. The court may rescind any of its prior
dispositional orders and enter any dispositional order authorized by this
code or may order that a new plan for the reintegration be prepared and
submitted to the court. If reintegration cannot be accomplished as
approved by the court, the court shall be informed and shall schedule a
hearing pursuant to subsection (j). No such hearing is required when the
parent voluntarily relinquishes parental rights or agrees to appointment of
a permanent guardian.

HB 2329—Am. by HCW 13
(j) When the court finds any of the following conditions exist, the
county or district attorney or the county or district attorney's designee shall
file a petition alleging the juvenile to be a child in need of care and
requesting termination of parental rights pursuant to the Kansas code for
care of children:
(1) The court determines that reintegration is not a viable alternative
and either adoption or permanent guardianship might be in the best
interests of the juvenile;
(2) the goal of the permanency plan is reintegration into the family
and the court determines after 12 months from the time such plan is first
submitted that progress is inadequate; or
(3) the juvenile has been in out-of-home placement for a cumulative
total of 15 of the last 22 months, excluding trial home visits and juvenile in
runaway status.
Nothing in this subsection shall be interpreted to prohibit termination of
parental rights prior to the expiration of 12 months.
(k) A petition to terminate parental rights is not required to be filed if
one of the following exceptions is documented to exist:
(1) The juvenile is in a stable placement with relatives;
(2) services set out in the case plan necessary for the safe return of
the juvenile have not been made available to the parent with whom
reintegration is planned; or
(3) there are one or more documented reasons why such filing would
not be in the best interests of the juvenile. Documented reasons may
include, but are not limited to: The juvenile has close emotional bonds
with a parent which should not be broken; the juvenile is 14 years of age
or older and, after advice and counsel, refuses to be adopted; insufficient
grounds exist for termination of parental rights; the juvenile is an
unaccompanied refugee minor; or there are international legal or
compelling foreign policy reasons precluding termination of parental
rights.
Sec. 3. K.S.A. 38-2369 is hereby amended to read as follows: 38-
2369. (a) Except as provided in subsection (e) and K.S.A. 38-2361(a)(13),
and amendments thereto, for the purpose of committing juvenile
offenders to a juvenile correctional facility, upon a finding by the judge
entered into the written order that the juvenile poses a significant risk of
harm to another or damage to property, the following placements shall be
applied by the judge in the cases specified in this subsection. If used, the
court shall establish a specific term of commitment as specified in this
subsection. The term of commitment established by the court shall not
exceed the overall case length limit. Before a juvenile offender is
committed to a juvenile correctional facility pursuant to this section, the
court shall administer a risk assessment tool, as described in K.S.A. 38-

HB 2329—Am. by HCW 14
2360, and amendments thereto, or review a risk assessment tool that was
administered within the past six months to the juvenile.
(1) Violent Offenders. (A) The violent offender I is defined as an
offender adjudicated as a juvenile offender for an offense which, if
committed by an adult, would constitute an off-grid felony. Offenders in
this category may be committed to a juvenile correctional facility for a
minimum term of 60 months and up to a maximum term of the offender
reaching the age of 22 years, six months. The aftercare term for this
offender is set at a minimum term of six months and up to a maximum
term of the offender reaching the age of 23 years.
(B) The violent offender II is defined as an offender adjudicated as a
juvenile offender for an offense which, if committed by an adult, would
constitute a nondrug severity level 1, 2 or 3 felony. Offenders in this
category may be committed to a juvenile correctional facility for a
minimum term of 24 months and up to a maximum term of the offender
reaching the age of 22 years, six months. The aftercare term for this
offender is set at a minimum term of six months and up to a maximum
term of the offender reaching the age of 23 years.
(2) Serious Offenders. (A) The serious offender I is defined as an
offender adjudicated as a juvenile offender for an offense which, if
committed by an adult, would constitute a nondrug severity level 4, person
felony.
Offenders in this category may be committed to a juvenile correctional
facility for a minimum term of 18 months and up to a maximum term of 36
months. The aftercare term for this offender is set at a minimum term of
six months and up to a maximum term of 24 months.
(B) The serious offender II is defined as an offender adjudicated as a
juvenile offender for an offense:
(i) Committed prior to July 1, 2012, which, if committed by an adult
prior to July 1, 2012, would constitute a drug severity level 1 or 2 felony;
or
(ii) committed on or after July 1, 2012, which, if committed by an
adult on or after July 1, 2012, would constitute a drug severity level 1, 2 or
3 felony or a nondrug severity level 5 or 6 person felony.
Offenders in this category may be committed to a juvenile correctional
facility for a minimum term of nine months and up to a maximum term of
18 months.
(C) The serious offender III is defined as an offender adjudicated as a
juvenile offender for an offense which, if committed by an adult, would
constitute a nondrug severity level 7, 8, 9 or 10 person felony with one
prior felony adjudication. Offenders in this category may only be
committed to a juvenile correctional facility if such offenders are assessed
as high-risk on a risk and needs assessment. Offenders in this category

HB 2329—Am. by HCW 15
may be committed to a juvenile correctional facility for a minimum term
of six months and up to a maximum term of 12 months.
(3) Chronic Offenders. (A) The chronic offender I, chronic felon is
defined as an offender adjudicated as a juvenile offender for an offense:
(i) Which, if committed by an adult, would constitute one present
nonperson felony adjudication and two prior felony adjudications;
(ii) committed prior to July 1, 2012, which, if committed by an adult
prior to July 1, 2012, would constitute one present drug severity level 3
felony adjudication and two prior felony adjudications; or
(iii) committed on or after July 1, 2012, which, if committed by an
adult on or after July 1, 2012, would constitute one present drug severity
level 4 felony adjudication and two prior felony adjudications.
Offenders in this category may only be committed to a juvenile
correctional facility if such offenders are assessed as moderate-risk or
high-risk offenders on a risk and needs assessment. Offenders in this
category may be committed to a juvenile correctional facility for a
minimum term of six months and up to a maximum term of 12 months.
(b) Conditional Release. If the court elects, a period of conditional
release may also be ordered pursuant to K.S.A. 38-2361, and amendments
thereto. The period of conditional release shall be limited to a maximum of
six months and shall be subject to graduated responses. The presumption
upon release shall be a return to the juvenile's home, unless the case plan
developed pursuant to K.S.A. 38-2373, and amendments thereto,
recommends a different reentry plan.
(1) Upon finding the juvenile violated a requirement or requirements
of conditional release, the court may enter one or more of the following
orders:
(A) Recommend additional conditions be added to those of the
existing conditional release.
(B) Order the offender to serve a period of detention pursuant to
K.S.A. 38-2361(g), and amendments thereto.
(C) Revoke or restrict the juvenile's driving privileges as described in
K.S.A. 38-2361(c), and amendments thereto.
(2) Discharge the offender from the custody of the secretary of
corrections, release the secretary of corrections from further
responsibilities in the case and enter any other appropriate orders.
(c) As used in this section "adjudication" includes out-of-state
juvenile adjudications. An out-of-state offense, which if committed by an
adult would constitute the commission of a felony or misdemeanor, shall
be classified as either a felony or a misdemeanor according to the
adjudicating jurisdiction. If an offense which if committed by an adult
would constitute the commission of a felony is a felony in another state, it
will be deemed a felony in Kansas. The state of Kansas shall classify the

HB 2329—Am. by HCW 16
offense, which if committed by an adult would constitute the commission
of a felony or misdemeanor, as person or nonperson. In designating such
offense as person or nonperson, reference to comparable offenses shall be
made. If the state of Kansas does not have a comparable offense, the out-
of-state adjudication shall be classified as a nonperson offense.
(d) The secretary of corrections shall work with the community to
provide on-going support and incentives for the development of additional
evidence-based community practices and programs to ensure that the
juvenile correctional facility is not frequently utilized.
(e) There shall be a rebuttable presumption that all offenders in the
chronic offender category and offenders at least 10 years of age but less
than 14 years of age in the serious offender II or III category, shall be
placed in the custody of the secretary for placement in a youth residential
facility in lieu of placement in the juvenile correctional facility. The
secretary shall ensure timely placement of such offender in a youth
residential facility and shall be responsible for the costs associated with
all aspects of such placement in accordance with K.S.A. 38-2399, and
amendments thereto, This presumption may be rebutted by a finding on the
record that the juvenile offender poses a significant risk of physical harm
to another.
Sec. 4. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 38-2391 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 38-2391. (a) Upon adjudication as a juvenile offender
pursuant to K.S.A. 38-2356, and amendments thereto, modification of
sentence pursuant to K.S.A. 38-2367, and amendments thereto, or
violation of a condition of sentence pursuant to K.S.A. 38-2368, and
amendments thereto, the court may impose one or more of the
sentencing alternatives under K.S.A. 38-2361, and amendments
thereto, for a period of time pursuant to this section and K.S.A. 38-
2369, and amendments thereto. The period of time ordered by the
court shall not exceed the overall case length limit.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c), the overall case length
limit shall be calculated based on the adjudicated offense and the
results of a risk and needs assessment, as follows:
(1) Offenders adjudicated for a misdemeanor may remain under
the jurisdiction of the court for up to 12 months;
(2) low-risk and moderate-risk offenders adjudicated for a felony
may remain under court jurisdiction for up to 15 months; and
(3) high-risk offenders adjudicated for a felony may remain
under court jurisdiction for up to 18 months.
(c) There shall be no overall case length limit for a juvenile
adjudicated for a felony which, if committed by an adult, would
constitute an off-grid felony or a nondrug severity level 1 through 4
person felony.

HB 2329—Am. by HCW 17
(d) When a juvenile is adjudicated for multiple counts, the
maximum overall case length shall be calculated based on the most
severe adjudicated count or any other adjudicated count at the court's
discretion. The court shall not run multiple adjudicated counts
consecutively.
(e) When the juvenile is adjudicated for multiple cases
simultaneously, the court shall run such cases concurrently.
(f) Upon expiration of the overall case length limit as defined in
subsection (b), the court's jurisdiction terminates and shall not be
extended, except as provided in subsection (g)(2).
(g) (1) For the purposes of placing juvenile offenders on
probation pursuant to K.S.A. 38-2361, and amendments thereto, the
court shall establish a specific term of probation as specified in this
subsection based on the most serious adjudicated count in
combination with the results of a risk and needs assessment, as
follows, except that the term of probation shall not exceed the overall
case length limit:
(A) Low-risk and moderate-risk offenders adjudicated for a
misdemeanor and low-risk offenders adjudicated for a felony may be
placed on probation for a term up to six months;
(B) high-risk offenders adjudicated for a misdemeanor and
moderate-risk offenders adjudicated for a felony may be placed on
probation for a term up to nine months; and
(C) high-risk offenders adjudicated for a felony may be placed on
probation for a term up to 12 months.
(2) The court may extend the term of probation if a juvenile
needs time to complete an evidence-based program as determined to
be necessary based on the results of a validated risk and needs
assessment and, if necessary, may extend the overall case length limit
to allow for completion of such program when failure to complete such
program is due to a repeated, intentional effort to delay by the
juvenile as reported by the evidence-based services provider. The
court may also extend the term of probation for good cause shown for
one month for low-risk offenders, three months for moderate-risk
offenders and six months for high-risk offenders. Prior to extension of
the initial probationary term, the court shall find and enter into the
written record the criteria permitting extension of probation.
Extensions of probation and the overall case length limit shall only be
granted incrementally. When the court extends the term of probation
for a juvenile offender, the court services officer or community
correctional services officer responsible for monitoring such juvenile
offender shall record the reason given for extending probation. Court
services officers shall report such records to the office of judicial

HB 2329—Am. by HCW 18
administration, and community correctional services officers shall
report such records to the department of corrections. The office of
judicial administration and the department of corrections shall report
such recorded data to the Kansas juvenile justice oversight committee
on a quarterly basis.
(3) The probation term limits do not apply to those offenders
adjudicated for an offense which, if committed by an adult, would
constitute an off-grid crime, rape as defined in K.S.A. 21-5503(a)(1),
and amendments thereto, aggravated criminal sodomy as defined in
K.S.A. 21-5504(b)(3), and amendments thereto, or murder in the
second degree as defined in K.S.A. 21-5403, and amendments thereto.
Such offenders may be placed on probation for a term consistent with
the overall case length limit.
(4) The probation term limits and overall case length limits
provided in this section shall be tolled during any time that the
offender has absconded from supervision while on probation, and the
time on such limits shall not start to run again until the offender is
located and brought back to the jurisdiction.
(h) For the purpose of placing juvenile offenders in detention
pursuant to K.S.A. 38-2361 and 38-2369, and amendments thereto, the
court shall establish a specific term of detention. The term of detention
shall not exceed the overall case length limit or the cumulative
detention limit. Cumulative detention use shall be limited to a
maximum of 45 90 days over the course of the juvenile offender's case,
except that there shall be no limit on cumulative detention for juvenile
offenders adjudicated for a felony which, if committed by an adult,
would constitute an off-grid felony or a nondrug severity level 1
through 4 person felony.
(i) The provisions of this section shall apply upon disposition or
15 days after adjudication, whichever is sooner, unless the juvenile
fails to appear for such juvenile's dispositional hearing. If a juvenile
fails to appear at such juvenile's dispositional hearing, the probation
term limits and overall case length limits provided in this section shall
not apply until the juvenile is brought before the court for disposition
in such juvenile's case.
(j) This section shall be a part of and supplemental to the revised
Kansas juvenile justice code.
Sec. 4. 5. K.S.A. 38-2399 is hereby amended to read as follows: 38-
2399. (a) The secretary of corrections may shall contract for use of not
more less than 50 40 35 nor more than 45 non-foster home beds in youth
residential facilities, and not more than 15 beds in any single facility, for
placement of juvenile offenders pursuant to K.S.A. 38-2361(a)(13) (a)(10)
and (a)(12), and amendments thereto.

HB 2329—Am. by HCW 19
(b) When contracting for services, the secretary shall:
(1) Contract with facilities that have high success rates and decrease
recidivism rates for juvenile offenders;
(2) consider contracting for bed space across the entire state to lower
the cost of transportation of juvenile offenders; and
(3) give priority to existing facilities that are able to meet the
requirements of the secretary for providing residential services to juvenile
offenders.
(c) This section shall take effect on and after January 1, 2018;
(4) determine regional allocation of non-foster home beds based on
the needs of the region utilizing available data on juvenile case filings;
and
(5) be responsible for the costs associated with all aspects of
placement of juvenile offenders described in subsection (a).
Sec. 6. K.S.A. 75-52,161 is hereby amended to read as follows: 75-
52,161. (a) There is hereby established the Kansas juvenile justice
oversight committee for the purpose of overseeing the implementation
of reform measures intended to improve the state's juvenile justice
system.
(b) The Kansas juvenile justice oversight committee shall be
composed of 21 members including the following individuals:
(1) The governor or the governor's designee;
(2) one member of the house of representatives appointed by the
speaker of the house of representatives;
(3) one member of the house of representatives appointed by the
minority leader of the house of representatives;
(4) one member of the senate appointed by the president of the
senate;
(5) one member of the senate appointed by the minority leader of
the senate;
(6) the secretary of corrections or the secretary's designee;
(7) the secretary for children and families or the secretary's
designee;
(8) the commissioner of education or the commissioner's
designee;
(9) the deputy secretary of juvenile services at the department of
corrections or the deputy's designee;
(10) the director of community-based services at the department
of corrections, or the director's designee;
(11) two district court judges appointed by the chief justice of the
supreme court;
(12) one chief court services officer appointed by the chief justice
of the supreme court;

HB 2329—Am. by HCW 20
(13) one member of the office of judicial administration
appointed by the chief justice of the supreme court;
(14) one juvenile defense attorney appointed by the chief justice
of the supreme court;
(15) one juvenile crime victim advocate appointed by the
governor;
(16) one member from a local law enforcement agency appointed
by the attorney general;
(17) one attorney from a prosecuting attorney's office appointed
by the attorney general;
(18) one member from a community corrections agency
appointed by the governor;
(19) one youth member of the Kansas advisory group on juvenile
justice and delinquency prevention appointed by the chair of the
Kansas advisory group on juvenile justice and delinquency
prevention; and
(20) one director of a juvenile detention facility appointed by the
attorney general.
(c) The committee shall be appointed by September 1, 2016, and
shall meet within 60 days after appointment and at least quarterly
thereafter, upon notice by the chair. The committee shall select a
chairperson and vice-chairperson, and 11 members shall be
considered a quorum.
(d) The committee shall perform the following duties:
(1) Guide and evaluate the implementation of the changes in law
relating to juvenile justice reform;
(2) define performance measures and recidivism;
(3) approve a plan developed by court services and the
department of corrections instituting a uniform process for collecting
and reviewing performance measures and recidivism, costs and
outcomes of programs;
(4) consider utilizing the Kansas criminal justice information
system for data collection and analyses;
(5) ensure system integration and accountability;
(6) monitor the fidelity of implementation efforts to programs
and training efforts;
(7) monitor any state expenditures that have been avoided by
reductions in the number of youth placed in out-of-home placements
to recommend to the governor and the legislature reinvestment of
funds into:
(A) Evidence-based practices and programs in the community
pursuant to K.S.A. 38-2302, and amendments thereto, for use by
intake and assessment services, immediate intervention, probation and

HB 2329—Am. by HCW 21
conditional release;
(B) training on evidence-based practices for juvenile justice
system staff, including, but not limited to, training in cognitive
behavioral therapies, family-centered therapies, substance abuse, sex
offender therapy and other services that address a juvenile's risks and
needs; and
(C) monitor the plan from the department of corrections for the
prioritization of funds pursuant to K.S.A. 75-52,164(d), and
amendments thereto;
(8) continue to review any additional topics relating to the
continued improvement of the juvenile justice system, including:
(A) The confidentiality of juvenile records;
(B) the reduction of the financial burden placed on families
involved in the juvenile justice system;
(C) juvenile due process rights, including, but not limited to, the
development of rights to a speedy trial and preliminary hearings;
(D) the improvement of conditions of confinement for juveniles;
(E) the removal from the home of children in need of care for
non-abuse or neglect, truancy, running away or additional child
behavior problems when there is no court finding of parental abuse or
neglect; and
(F) the requirement for youth residential facilities to maintain
sight and sound separation between children in need of care that have
an open juvenile offender case and children in need of care that do not
have an open juvenile offender case;
(9) adhere to the goals of the juvenile justice code as provided in
K.S.A. 38-2301, and amendments thereto;
(10) analyze and investigate gaps in the juvenile justice system
and explore alternatives to out-of-home placement of juvenile
offenders in youth residential facilities;
(11) identify evidence-based training models, needs and resources
and make appropriate recommendations;
(12) study and create a plan to address the disparate treatment
and availability of resources for juveniles with mental health needs in
the juvenile justice system; and
(13) review portions of juvenile justice reform that require the
department of corrections and the office of judicial administration to
cooperate and make recommendations when there is not consensus
between the two agencies; and
(14) monitor the impact and effectiveness of placement of juvenile
offenders in non-foster home beds in youth residential facilities.
(e) The committee shall issue an annual report to the governor,
the president of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives

HB 2329—Am. by HCW 22
and the chief justice of the supreme court on or before November 30
each year starting in 2017. Such report shall include:
(1) An assessment of the progress made in implementation of
juvenile justice reform efforts;
(2) a summary of the committee's efforts in fulfilling its duties as
set forth in this section;
(3) an analysis of the recidivism data obtained by the committee
pursuant to this section;
(4) a summary of the averted costs determined pursuant to this
section and a recommendation for any reinvestment of the averted
costs to fund services or programs to expand Kansas' continuum of
alternatives for juveniles who would otherwise be placed in out-of-
home placements;
(5) an analysis of detention risk-assessment data to determine if
any disparate impacts resulted at any stage of the juvenile justice
system based on race, sex, national origin or economic status;
(6) recommendations for continued improvements to the juvenile
justice system;
(7) data pertaining to the completion of training on evidence-
based practices in juvenile justice, including, but not limited to, the
number of judges, district and county attorneys and appointed
defense attorneys, that participated in training; and
(8) data received from the office of judicial administration and
the department of corrections, pursuant to K.S.A. 38-2391, and
amendments thereto, pertaining to extensions of probation for juvenile
offenders and an analysis of such data to identify how probation
extensions are being used and conclusions regarding the effectiveness
of such extensions.
(f) After initial appointment, members appointed to this
committee by the governor, the president of the senate, the speaker of
the house of representatives or the chief justice of the supreme court
pursuant to subsection (b), shall serve for a term of two years and
shall be eligible for reappointment to such position. All members
appointed to the committee shall serve until a successor has been duly
appointed.
(g) The staff of the Kansas department of corrections shall
provide such assistance as may be requested by the committee. To
facilitate the organization of the meetings of the committee, the
Kansas department of corrections shall provide administrative
assistance.
Sec. 5. 7. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 75-52,164 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 75-52,164. (a) (1) There is hereby established in the state treasury
the evidence-based programs account of the state general fund, which shall

HB 2329—Am. by HCW 23
be administered by the department of corrections.
(2) Except as provided in paragraph (4), all expenditures from the
evidence-based programs account of the state general fund shall be for the
development and implementation of evidence-based community programs
and practices for:
(A) Juvenile offenders and their families;
(B) juveniles experiencing behavioral health crisis and their families;
(C) children who have been administered a risk and needs assessment
and have been identified as needing services pursuant to K.S.A. 2024
Supp. 38-2292, and amendments thereto; and
(D) grants as provided in subsection (e).
(2)(3) Evidence-based community programs and practices may be
administered by community supervision offices, juvenile intake and
assessment, court services, community corrections, juvenile crisis
intervention centers, community mental health centers, community health
centers, the youth advocate program, jobs for America's graduates Kansas
transition services and any other community-based service provider
offering evidence-based community programs.
(4) Subject to provisions of appropriation acts, the secretary of
corrections shall make expenditures from the evidence-based programs
account of the state general fund moneys, in an amount not to exceed
$10,000,000 in any fiscal year, to contract for non-foster home beds in
youth residential facilities for placement of juvenile offenders as required
in K.S.A. 38-2399, and amendments thereto.
(3)(5) All expenditures from the evidence-based programs account of
the state general fund shall be made in accordance with appropriation acts
upon warrants of the director of accounts and reports issued pursuant to
vouchers approved by the secretary of corrections or the secretary's
designee.
(b) At least annually, throughout the year, the secretary of corrections
shall determine and certify to the director of accounts and reports the
amount in each account of the state general fund of a state agency that has
been determined by the secretary to be actual or projected cost savings as a
result of cost avoidance resulting from decreased reliance on incarceration
in the juvenile correctional facility and placement in youth residential
centers. The baseline shall be calculated on the cost of incarceration and
placement in fiscal year 2015.
(c) Upon receipt of a certification pursuant to subsection (b), the
director of accounts and reports shall transfer the amount certified
pursuant to subsection (b) from each account of the state general fund of a
state agency that has been determined by the secretary of corrections to be
actual or projected cost savings to the evidence-based programs account of
the state general fund.

HB 2329—Am. by HCW 24
(d) Prioritization of evidence-based programs account of the state
general fund moneys will be given to regions that demonstrate a high rate
of out-of-home placement of juvenile offenders per capita that have few
existing community-based alternatives.
(e) (1) The secretary of corrections shall develop and implement a
grant program with the goal of implementing evidence-based community
programs described in subsection (a)(2)(D) and promising practices
throughout the state, subject to the availability of funding in the evidence-
based programs account of the state general fund after other expenditures
for evidence-based programs are made. The secretary shall adopt grant
requirements in accordance with this section. Any provider of evidence-
based community programs for juveniles may apply for a grant. The grant
program shall give priority to any county that demonstrates a low
availability of evidence-based community programs for juveniles. The
secretary shall evaluate the programs that received a grant to ensure the
program is being delivered as such program was designed.
(2) Child welfare case management providers shall not be eligible to
receive grants under this subsection.
(f) Expenditures made from the evidence-based programs account of
the state general fund shall be made promptly and on a rolling basis to
develop and implement evidence-based community programs as services
are needed throughout the state and provide non-foster home beds in youth
residential facilities for placement of juvenile offenders as required in
subsection (a).
(g) The evidence-based programs account of the state general fund
and any other moneys transferred pursuant to this section shall be used for
the purposes set forth in this section and for no other governmental
purposes. It is the intent of the legislature that the funds and the moneys
deposited in this fund shall remain intact and inviolate for the purposes set
forth in this section.
Sec. 8. K.S.A. 75-7023 is hereby amended to read as follows: 75-
7023. (a) The secretary for children and families may contract with the
secretary of corrections to provide for the juvenile intake and
assessment system and programs for children in need of care. Except
as provided further, the secretary of corrections shall promulgate
rules and regulations for the juvenile intake and assessment system
and programs concerning juvenile offenders. If the secretary contracts
with the office of judicial administration to administer the juvenile
intake and assessment system and programs concerning juvenile
offenders, the supreme court administrative orders shall be in force
until such contract ends and the rules and regulations concerning
juvenile intake and assessment system and programs concerning
juvenile offenders have been adopted.

HB 2329—Am. by HCW 25
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, records,
reports and information obtained as a part of the juvenile intake and
assessment process shall not be admitted into evidence in any
proceeding and shall not be used in a child in need of care proceeding
or a juvenile offender proceeding.
(1) Such records, reports and information may be used in a child
in need of care proceeding for diagnostic and referral purposes and by
the court in considering dispositional alternatives. If the records,
reports or information are in regard to abuse or neglect, which is
required to be reported under K.S.A. 38-2223, and amendments
thereto, such records, reports or information may then be used for any
purpose in a child in need of care proceeding pursuant to the revised
Kansas code for care of children.
(2) Such records, reports and information may be used in a
juvenile offender proceeding only if such records, reports and
information are in regard to the possible trafficking of a runaway.
Such records, reports and information in regard to the possible
trafficking of a runaway shall be made available to the appropriate
county or district attorney and the court, and shall be used only for
diagnostic and referral purposes.
(c) Upon a juvenile being taken into custody pursuant to K.S.A.
38-2330, and amendments thereto, a juvenile intake and assessment
worker shall complete the intake and assessment process, making
release and referral determinations as required by supreme court
administrative order or district court rule, or except as provided
above [in] rules and regulations established by the secretary of
corrections.
(d) Except as provided in subsection (g) and in addition to any
other information required by the supreme court administrative
order, the secretary for children and families, the secretary of
corrections or by the district court of such district, the juvenile intake
and assessment worker shall collect the following information either in
person or over two-way audio or audio-visual communication:
(1) The results of a standardized detention risk assessment tool
pursuant to K.S.A. 38-2302, and amendments thereto, if detention is
being considered for the juvenile, such as the problem oriented
screening instrument for teens;
(2) criminal history, including indications of criminal gang
involvement;
(3) abuse history;
(4) substance abuse history;
(5) history of prior community services used or treatments
provided;

HB 2329—Am. by HCW 26
(6) educational history;
(7) medical history;
(8) family history; and
(9) the results of other assessment instruments as approved by the
secretary.
(e) After completion of the intake and assessment process for
such child, the intake and assessment worker shall make both a
release and a referral determination:
(1) Release the child to the custody of the child's parent, other
legal guardian or another appropriate adult.
(2) Conditionally release the child to the child's parent, other
legal guardian or another appropriate adult if the intake and
assessment worker believes that if the conditions are met, it would be
in the child's best interest to release the child to such child's parent,
other legal guardian or another appropriate adult; and the intake and
assessment worker has reason to believe that it might be harmful to
the child to release the child to such child's parents, other legal
guardian or another appropriate adult without imposing the
conditions. The conditions may include, but not be limited to the
alternatives listed in K.S.A. 38-2331(b), and amendments thereto, and
the following:
(A) Participation of the child in counseling;
(B) participation of members of the child's family in counseling;
(C) participation by the child, members of the child's family and
other relevant persons in mediation;
(D) provision of outpatient treatment for the child;
(E) referral of the child and the child's family to the secretary for
children and families for services and the agreement of the child and
family to accept and participate in the services offered;
(F) referral of the child and the child's family to available
community resources or services and the agreement of the child and
family to accept and participate in the services offered;
(G) requiring the child and members of the child's family to enter
into a behavioral contract which may provide for regular school
attendance among other requirements; or
(H) any special conditions necessary to protect the child from
future abuse or neglect.
(3) Deliver the child to a shelter facility or a licensed attendant
care center along with the law enforcement officer's written
application for a maximum stay of up to 72 hours. The shelter facility
or licensed attendant care facility shall then have custody as if the
child had been directly delivered to the facility by the law enforcement
officer pursuant to K.S.A. 38-2232, and amendments thereto.

HB 2329—Am. by HCW 27
(4) The intake and assessment worker shall also refer the
juvenile's case to one of the following:
(A) An immediate intervention program pursuant to K.S.A. 38-
2346(b), and amendments thereto;
(B) the county or district attorney for appropriate proceedings to
be filed, with or without a recommendation that the juvenile be
considered for alternative means of adjudication programs pursuant
to K.S.A. 38-2389, and amendments thereto, or immediate
intervention pursuant to K.S.A. 38-2346, and amendments thereto; or
(C) refer the child and family to the secretary for children and
families for investigations in regard to the allegations.
(f) The secretary of corrections, in conjunction with the office of
judicial administration, shall develop, implement and validate on the
Kansas juvenile population, a statewide detention risk assessment tool.
(1) The assessment shall be conducted for each youth under
consideration for detention and may only be conducted by a juvenile
intake and assessment worker who has completed training to conduct
the detention risk assessment tool.
(2) The secretary and the office of judicial administration shall
establish cutoff scores determining eligibility for placement in a
juvenile detention facility or for referral to a community-based
alternative to detention and shall collect and report data regarding the
use of the detention risk assessment tool.
(3) (A) The detention risk assessment tool includes an override
function that may be approved by the court for use under certain
circumstances. If approved by the court, the juvenile intake and
assessment worker or the court may override the detention risk
assessment tool score in order to direct placement in a short-term
shelter facility, a community-based alternative to detention or, subject
to K.S.A. 38-2331, and amendments thereto, a juvenile detention
facility. Such override must be documented, include a written
explanation and receive approval from the director of the intake and
assessment center or the court.
(B) The court shall approve an override function of the detention risk
assessment tool for use when a juvenile is alleged to have possessed or
used a firearm during the commission of an offense. In such an instance,
the juvenile intake and assessment worker or the court shall place such
juvenile in a juvenile detention facility.
(4) If a juvenile meets one or more eligibility criteria for detention
or referral to a community-based alternative to detention, the person
with authority to detain shall maintain discretion to release the
juvenile if other less restrictive measures would be adequate.
(g) Parents, guardians and juveniles may access the juvenile

HB 2329—Am. by HCW 28
intake and assessment programs on a voluntary basis. The parent or
guardian shall be responsible for the costs of any such program
utilized.
(h) Every juvenile intake and assessment worker shall receive
training in evidence-based practices, including, but not limited to:
(1) Risk and needs assessments;
(2) individualized diversions based on needs and strengths;
(3) graduated responses;
(4) family engagement;
(5) trauma-informed care;
(6) substance abuse;
(7) mental health; and
(8) special education.
Sec. 6. 9. K.S.A. 38-2361, 38-2365, 38-2369 and, 38-2399, 75-
52,161 and 75-7023 and K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 38-2391 and 75-52,164 are
hereby repealed.
Sec. 7. 10. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.